Washington statutes.
RCW 10.89.030

Construction as to lawfulness of arrest.

RCW 10.89.010 shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this state which otherwise would be lawful.

[ 1943 c 261 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2252-3. Formerly RCW 10.88.100.]